Utah statutes.
76-6-109.   Offenses committed against timber, mining, or agricultural
industries -- Enhanced penalties.
(1)  A person who commits any criminal offense with the intent to halt,
impede, obstruct, or interfere with the lawful management, cultivation, or
harvesting of trees or timber, or the management or operations of agricultural
or mining industries is subject to an enhanced penalty for the offense as
provided below.  However, this section does not apply to action protected by
the National Labor Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. Section 151 et seq., or the
Federal Railway Labor Act, 45 U.S.C. Section 151 et seq.
(2)  The prosecuting attorney, or grand jury if an indictment is returned,
shall cause to be subscribed upon the complaint in misdemeanor cases or the
information or indictment in felony cases notice that the defendant is subject
to the enhanced penalties provided under this section.
(3) If the trier of fact finds beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant
committed any criminal offense with the intent to halt, impede, obstruct, or
interfere with the lawful management, cultivation, or harvesting of trees or
timber, or the management or operations of agricultural or mining industries,
the penalties are enhanced as provided in this Subsection (3):
(a)  a class C misdemeanor is a class B misdemeanor, with a mandatory fine of
not less than $1,000, which is in addition to any term of imprisonment the
court may impose;
(b)  a class B misdemeanor is a Class A misdemeanor, with a fine of not less
than $2,500, which is in addition to any term of imprisonment the court may
impose;
(c)  a class A misdemeanor is a third degree felony, with a fine of not less
than $5,000, which is in addition to any term of imprisonment the court may
impose;
(d)  a third degree felony is a second degree felony, with a fine of not less
than $7,500, which is in addition to any term of imprisonment the court may
impose; and
(e)  a second degree felony is subject to a fine of not less than $10,000,
which is in addition to any term of imprisonment the court may impose.
